HurFST/Main/Hurrian.foma
source ../Main/Main.foma
define TransitivityMarking "-TR" -> 0 || ".PRS" _ ["-2A"|"-3A"] ".SG";
define VerbalNumberCumulation "-PL" -> ".PL" || "-2A" _ ;
define Cumulation VerbalNumberCumulation;
define PluralEpenthesis [..] <-> "-EPNTH" || "-PL" _ ["-ERG"|"-COM"|"-EQU2"|"-ABL/INS"];
define PronEpenthesis [..] <-> "-EPNTH" || ["2PRON" ".SG"|"1PRON" "-PL"] _ "-DIR";
define RelatorPlural [..] <-> ".PL" || "-RELAT" _ "-PL";
define Person "-1A" | "-2A" | "-3A";
define ZeroExponence ".PRS" -> 0 || Phoneme _  Person;
define DynamicMorphotactics TransitivityMarking.i .o. Cumulation .o. 
	PluralEpenthesis .o. PronEpenthesis .o. RelatorPlural .o. ZeroExponence;
define Hurrian DynamicMorphotactics .o. Main;
